Utah statutes.
48-2c-109.   Transaction of business outside state.

It is the intention of the Utah Legislature by the enactment of this chapter that the legal existence of companies formed under this chapter be recognized beyond the boundaries of this state and that, subject to any reasonable registration or filing requirements, any such company transacting business outside this state be recognized as a limited liability company and be granted full faith and credit under Section 1 of Article IV of the Constitution of the United States.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 2001 General Session 

Repealed by Chapter 353, 2011 General Session

